District of Columbia statutes.
42-409

Bonds and contracts relating to land recordable.

Any title bond or other written contract in relation to land may be acknowledged, certified, and recorded in the same manner and with like effect as to notice as deeds for the conveyance of land.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1268, ch. 854, § 501
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 531, ch. 1329
1981 Ed., § 45-805.
1973 Ed., § 45-505.